District of Columbia statutes.
22-3009.03

First degree sexual abuse of a secondary education student.

Any teacher, counselor, principal, coach, or other person of authority in a secondary level school who engages in a sexual act with a student under the age of 20 years enrolled in that school or school system, or causes that student to engage in a sexual act, shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 years, fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 208c
as added Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 204, 57 DCR 5405
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(j), 60 DCR 2064
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “in an amount not to exceed $100,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(j) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.